dictionaries/mn_MN/src/hunspell/mn_MN.aff
FLAG long
SFX N0 Y 90
SFX N0 0 аа [^аойиыуьяеёю]
SFX N0 0 аар/00 [^аойиыуьяеёю]
SFX N0 0 аас/00 [^аойиыуьяеёю]
SFX N0 0 ад [^аоэөийыуүёяюеы]с
SFX N0 0 даа [^аоэөийыуүёяюеы]с
SFX N0 0 ад [дтзцх]
SFX N0 0 даа [дтзцх]
SFX N0 0 а [^аойиыуярхчцль][аию]
SFX N0 0 ар/00 [^аойиыуярхчцль][аию]
SFX N0 0 ас/00 [^аойиыуярхчцль][аию]
SFX N0 0 ар/00 ла
SFX N0 0 ас/00 ла
SFX N0 0 ар/00 и
SFX N0 0 ас/00 и
SFX N0 0 г/00 [аойиыуяеёдтрхчцшлнь][уйяюё]
SFX N0 0 гаар/00 [аойиыуяеёдтрхчцшлнь][уйяюё]
SFX N0 0 гаас/00 [аойиыуяеёдтрхчцшлнь][уйяюё]
SFX N0 0 г/00 ы
SFX N0 0 гаар/00 ы
SFX N0 0 гаас/00 ы
SFX N0 0 гийн [аойиуядтрхчцшнль][уяюё]
SFX N0 0 гийнд/00 [аойиуядтрхчцшнль][уяюё]
SFX N0 0 гийнх/040870 [аойиуядтрхчцшнль][уяюё]
SFX N0 0 г/00 [аойиуярхжчш][ае]
SFX N0 0 гаар/00 [аойиуярхжчш][ае]
SFX N0 0 гаас/00 [аойиуярхжчш][ае]
SFX N0 0 гийн [аойиуярхжчш][ае]
SFX N0 0 гийнд/00 [аойиуярхжчш][ае]
SFX N0 0 гийнх/040870 [аойиуярхжчш][ае]
SFX N0 0 д [^дтжзсшцчх]ь
SFX N0 0 даа [^дтжзсшцчх]ь
SFX N0 0 д [^дтжзсшцчхгкбпврфь]
SFX N0 0 даа [^дтжзсшцчхгкбпврфь]
SFX N0 0 ид/00 [жчш]
SFX N0 0 ийг/00 [гкжчш]
SFX N0 0 ийн [гкжчш]
SFX N0 0 ийнд/00 [гкжчш]
SFX N0 0 ийнх/040870 [гкжчш]
SFX N0 0 йг/00 [^айиуюя]и
SFX N0 0 йн [^айиуюя]и
SFX N0 0 йнд/00 [^айиуюя]и
SFX N0 0 йнх/040870 [^айиуюя]и
SFX N0 0 н [аиыуяеюё]й
SFX N0 0 нд/00 [аиыуяюеё]й
SFX N0 0 нх/040870 [аиыуяюеё]й
SFX N0 0 н ы
SFX N0 0 нд/00 ы
SFX N0 0 нх/040870 ы
SFX N0 0 т [аоэөийуүёяюеы]с
SFX N0 0 таа [аоэөийуүёяюеы]с
SFX N0 0 т [гкбпврф]
SFX N0 0 таа [гкбпврф]
SFX N0 0 ы н
SFX N0 0 ыг/00 [^аоийыуьгкжчшяюеё]
SFX N0 0 ыд/00 н
SFX N0 0 ын [^аойиыуьнгкжчшяюеё]
SFX N0 0 ынд/00 [^аойиыуьнгкжчшяюеё]
SFX N0 0 ынх/040870 [^аоийыуьнгкжчшяюеё]
SFX N0 0 ых/040870 н
SFX N0 а ыг/00 [^айиуярхжчш]а
SFX N0 а ын [^айиуярхжчш]а
SFX N0 а ынд/00 [^айиуярхжчш]а
SFX N0 а ынх/040870 [^айиуярхжчш]а
SFX N0 о аа [^айиуяхжчш]о
SFX N0 о аар/00 [^айиуяхжчш]о
SFX N0 о аас/00 [^айиуяхжчш]о
SFX N0 о ыг/00 [^айиуяхжчш]о
SFX N0 о ын [^айиуяхжчш]о
SFX N0 о ынд/00 [^айиуяхжчш]о
SFX N0 о ынх/040870 [^айиуяхжчш]о
SFX N0 е аа [^аойиуярхжчш]е
SFX N0 е аар/00 [^аойиуярхжчш]е
SFX N0 е аас/00 [^аойиуярхжчш]е
SFX N0 е ыг/00 [^айиуярхжчш]е
SFX N0 е ын [^айиуярхжчш]е
SFX N0 е ынд/00 [^айиуярхжчш]е
SFX N0 е ынх/040870 [^айиуярхжчш]е
SFX N0 ь иа ь
SFX N0 ь иар/00 ь
SFX N0 ь иас/00 ь
SFX N0 ь ид [дтжзсшцчх]ь
SFX N0 ь идаа [дтжзсшцчх]ь
SFX N0 ь ийг/00 ь
SFX N0 ь ийн ь
SFX N0 ь ийнд/00 ь
SFX N0 ь ийнх/040870 ь
SFX N0 ь итай/70 [дтжзсшцчх]ь
SFX N0 0 тай/70 [^дтжзсшцчх]ь
SFX N0 0 тай/70 [^ь]
SFX N0 0 гүй/73 .

SFX N1 Y 88
SFX N1 0 гийн [аойиуядстрхчцшлнь][уяюё]
SFX N1 0 гийнд/01 [аойиуядстрхчцшлнь][уяюё]
SFX N1 0 гийнх/050871 [аойиуядстрхчцшлнь][уяюё]
SFX N1 0 г/01 [аойиыуяеёдстрхчцшлнь][уйяюё]
SFX N1 0 гоор/01 [аойиыуяеёдстрхчцшлнь][уйяюё]
SFX N1 0 гоос/01 [аойиыуяеёдстрхчцшлнь][уйяюё]
SFX N1 0 гийн [ойиуярхжчш][ае]
SFX N1 0 гийнд/01 [ойиуярхжчш][ае]
SFX N1 0 гийнх/050871 [ойиуярхжчш][ае]
SFX N1 0 г/01 [ойиуярхжчш][ае]
SFX N1 0 гоор/01 [ойиуярхжчш][ае]
SFX N1 0 гоос/01 [ойиуярхжчш][ае]
SFX N1 0 г/01 ы
SFX N1 0 гоор/01 ы
SFX N1 0 гоос/01 ы
SFX N1 0 д [^дтжзсшцчх]ь
SFX N1 0 доо [^дтжзсшцчх]ь
SFX N1 0 д [^дтжзсшцчхгкбпврфь]
SFX N1 0 доо [^дтжзсшцчхгкбпврфь]
SFX N1 0 ид/01 [жчш]
SFX N1 0 ийг/01 [гкжчш]
SFX N1 0 ийн [гкжчш]
SFX N1 0 ийнд/01 [гкжчш]
SFX N1 0 ийнх/050871 [гкжчш]
SFX N1 0 йг/01 [^ойиуяю]и
SFX N1 0 йн [^ойиуюя]и
SFX N1 0 йнд/01 [^ойиуяю]и
SFX N1 0 йнх/050871 [^ойиуяю]и
SFX N1 0 н [оиыуяеюё]й
SFX N1 0 нд/01 [оиыуяюеё]й
SFX N1 0 нх/050871 [оиыуяюеё]й
SFX N1 0 н ы
SFX N1 0 нд/01 ы
SFX N1 0 нх/050871 ы
SFX N1 0 од [^аоэөийуүёяюеы]с
SFX N1 0 доо [^аоэөийуүёяюеы]с
SFX N1 0 од [дтзцх]
SFX N1 0 доо [дтзцх]
SFX N1 0 оо [^аойиыуьяюеё]
SFX N1 0 оор/01 [^аойиыуьяюеё]
SFX N1 0 оос/01 [^аойиыуьяюеё]
SFX N1 0 о [^ойиуяёрхчстцлнь]о
SFX N1 0 ор/01 [^ойиуяёрхчстцлнь]о
SFX N1 0 ос/01 [^ойиуяёрхчстцлнь]о
SFX N1 0 ор/01 и
SFX N1 0 ос/01 и
SFX N1 0 т [аоэөийуүёяюеы]с
SFX N1 0 тоо [аоэөийуүёяюеы]с
SFX N1 0 т [гкбпврф]
SFX N1 0 тоо [гкбпврф]
SFX N1 0 ы н
SFX N1 0 ыг/01 [^аоийыуьгкжчшяеёю]
SFX N1 0 ыд/01 н
SFX N1 0 ын [^аойиыуьнгкжчшяеёю]
SFX N1 0 ынд/01 [^аойиыуьнгкжчшяеёю]
SFX N1 0 ынх/050871 [^аоийыуьнгкжчшяеё]
SFX N1 0 ых/050871 н
SFX N1 о ыг/01 [^ойиуярхжчш]о
SFX N1 о ын [^ойиуярхжчш]о
SFX N1 о ынд/01 [^ойиуярхжчш]о
SFX N1 о ынх/050871 [^ойиуярхжчш]о
SFX N1 а ыг/01 [^ойиуярхжчш]а
SFX N1 а оо [^ойиуярхжчш]а
SFX N1 а оор/01 [^ойиуярхжчш]а
SFX N1 а оос/01 [^ойиуярхжчш]а
SFX N1 а ын [^ойиуярхжчш]а
SFX N1 а ынд/01 [^ойиуярхжчш]а
SFX N1 а ынх/050871 [^ойиуярхжчш]а
SFX N1 е оо [^ойиуярхжчш]е
SFX N1 е оор/01 [^ойиуярхжчш]е
SFX N1 е оос/01 [^ойиуярхжчш]е
SFX N1 е ыг/01 [^ойиуярхжчш]е
SFX N1 е ын [^ойиуярхжчш]е
SFX N1 е ынд/01 [^ойиуярхжчш]е
SFX N1 е ынх/050871 [^ойиуярхжчш]е
SFX N1 ь ид [дтжзсшцчх]ь
SFX N1 ь идоо [дтжзсшцчх]ь
SFX N1 ь ийг/01 ь
SFX N1 ь ийн ь
SFX N1 ь ийнд/01 ь
SFX N1 ь ийнх/050871 ь
SFX N1 ь ио ь
SFX N1 ь иор/01 ь
SFX N1 ь иос/01 ь
SFX N1 ь итой/71 [дтжзсшцчх]ь
SFX N1 0 той/71 [^дтжзсшцчх]ь
SFX N1 0 той/71 [^ь]
SFX N1 0 гүй/73 .

SFX N2 Y 60
SFX N2 0 гийн [өэйиүердтхчцшлньт][үяюё]
SFX N2 0 гийнд/02 [өэйиүердтхчцшлньт][үяюё]
SFX N2 0 гийнх/060872 [өэйиүердтхчцшлньт][үяюё]
SFX N2 0 г/02 [өэйиыүердтхчцшьлнт][үйяюё]
SFX N2 0 гөөр/02 [өэйиыүердтхчшцлньт][үйяюё]
SFX N2 0 гөөс/02 [өэйиыүердтхчцшлньт][үйяюё]
SFX N2 0 гийн [өэйиүерх][өе]
SFX N2 0 гийнд/02 [өэйиүерх][өе]
SFX N2 0 гийнх/060872 [өэйиүерх][өе]
SFX N2 0 г/02 [өэйиүерх][өе]
SFX N2 0 гөөр/02 [өэйиүерх][өе]
SFX N2 0 гөөс/02 [өэйиүерх][өе]
SFX N2 0 д [^дтжзсшцчхгкбпврфь]
SFX N2 0 дөө [^дтжзсшцчхгкбпврфь]
SFX N2 0 ид/02 [жчш]
SFX N2 0 ий н
SFX N2 0 ийг/02 [^өэийыүяюеё]
SFX N2 0 ийд/02 н
SFX N2 0 ийн [^өэйиыүняюеё]
SFX N2 0 ийнд/02 [^өэйиыүняюеё]
SFX N2 0 ийнх/060872 [^өэийыүняюеё]
SFX N2 0 ийх/060872 н
SFX N2 0 йг/02 [^өэйиүе]и
SFX N2 0 йн [^өэйиүе]и
SFX N2 0 йнд/02 [^өэйиүе]и
SFX N2 0 йнх/060872 [^өэйиүе]и
SFX N2 0 н [өэиыүяюеё]й
SFX N2 0 нд/02 [өэиыүяюеё]й
SFX N2 0 нх/060872 [өэиыүяюеё]й
SFX N2 0 өд [^аоэөийуүёяюеы]с
SFX N2 0 дөө [^аоэөийуүёяюеы]с
SFX N2 0 өд [дтзцх]
SFX N2 0 дөө [дтзцх]
SFX N2 0 өө [^өэйиүюе]
SFX N2 0 өөр/02 [^өэйиыүяюеё]
SFX N2 0 өөс/02 [^өэйиыүяюеё]
SFX N2 0 ө [^өэйиүерхчцлнь][иөяюеё]
SFX N2 0 өр/02 [^өэйиүерхчцлнь][өяюеё]
SFX N2 0 өс/02 [^өэйиүерхчцлнь][өяюеё]
SFX N2 0 өр/02 и
SFX N2 0 өс/02 и
SFX N2 0 т [аоэөийуүёяюеы]с
SFX N2 0 төө [аоэөийуүёяюеы]с
SFX N2 0 т [гкбпврф]
SFX N2 0 төө [гкбпврф]
SFX N2 ө ийг/02 [^өэйиүерх]ө
SFX N2 ө ийн [^өэйиүерх]ө
SFX N2 ө ийнд/02 [^өэйиүерх]ө
SFX N2 ө ийнх/060872 [^өэйиүерх]ө
SFX N2 е өө [^өэйиүерх]е
SFX N2 е өөр/02 [^өэйиүерх]е
SFX N2 е өөс/02 [^өэйиүерх]е
SFX N2 е ийг/02 [^өэйиүерх]е
SFX N2 е ийн [^өэйиүерх]е
SFX N2 е ийнд/02 [^өэйиүерх]е
SFX N2 е ийнх/060872 [^өэйиүерх]е
SFX N2 ь итэй/72 [дтжзсшцчх]ь
SFX N2 0 тэй/72 [^дтжзсшцчх]ь
SFX N2 0 тэй/72 [^ь]
SFX N2 0 гүй/73 .

SFX N3 Y 71
SFX N3 0 гийн [эйиүердтхчцшлньт][үяюё]
SFX N3 0 гийнд/03 [эйиүердтхчцшлньт][үяюё]
SFX N3 0 гийнх/070873 [эйиүердтхчцшлньт][үяюё]
SFX N3 0 г/03 [эйиүерхчцшлньтд][үйяюё]
SFX N3 0 гээр/03 [эйиүерхчцшлньтд][үйяюё]
SFX N3 0 гээс/03 [эйиүерхчцшлньтд][үйяюё]
SFX N3 0 гийн [эйиүеюрх][эе]
SFX N3 0 гийнд/03 [эйиүеюрх][эе]
SFX N3 0 гийнх/070873 [эйиүеюрх][эе]
SFX N3 0 г/03 [эйиүеюрх][эе]
SFX N3 0 гээр/03 [эйиүеюрх][эе]
SFX N3 0 гээс/03 [эйиүеюрх][эе]
SFX N3 0 д [^дтжзсшцчх]ь
SFX N3 0 дээ [^дтжзсшцчх]ь
SFX N3 0 д [^дтжзсшцчхгкбпврфь]
SFX N3 0 дээ [^дтжзсшцчхгкбпврфь]
SFX N3 0 ид/03 [жчш]
SFX N3 0 ий н
SFX N3 0 ийг/03 [^эийыүьяюеё]
SFX N3 0 ийд/03 н
SFX N3 0 ийн [^эйиыүньяюеё]
SFX N3 0 ийнд/03 [^эйиыүньяюеё]
SFX N3 0 ийнх/070873 [^эийыүньяюеё]
SFX N3 0 ийх/070873 н
SFX N3 0 йг/03 [^эйиүе]и
SFX N3 0 йн [^эйиүе]и
SFX N3 0 йнд/03 [^эйиүе]и
SFX N3 0 йнх/070873 [^эйиүе]и
SFX N3 0 н [эиыүяюеё]й
SFX N3 0 нд/03 [эиыүяюеё]й
SFX N3 0 нх/070873 [эиыүяюеё]й
SFX N3 0 т [аоэөийуүёяюеы]с
SFX N3 0 тээ [аоэөийуүёяюеы]с
SFX N3 0 эд [^аоэөийуүёяюеы]с
SFX N3 0 дээ [^аоэөийуүёяюеы]с
SFX N3 0 т [гкбпврф]
SFX N3 0 тээ [гкбпврф]
SFX N3 0 эд [дтзцх]
SFX N3 0 дээ [дтзцх]
SFX N3 0 э [^эйиүеюрх][иэ]
SFX N3 0 эр/03 [^эйиүеюрх]э
SFX N3 0 эс/03 [^эйиүеюрх]э
SFX N3 0 эр/03 и
SFX N3 0 эс/03 и
SFX N3 0 ээ [^эөйиүьяюеё]
SFX N3 0 ээр/03 [^эөйиүьяюеё]
SFX N3 0 ээс/03 [^эөйиүьяюеё]
SFX N3 э ийг/03 [^эйиүеюрх]э
SFX N3 э ийн [^эйиүеюрх]э
SFX N3 э ийнд/03 [^эйиүеюрх]э
SFX N3 э ийнх/070873 [^эйиүеюрх]э
SFX N3 е ээр/03 [^эйиүеюрх]е
SFX N3 е ээс/03 [^эйиүеюрх]е
SFX N3 е ээ [^эйиүеюрх]е
SFX N3 е ийг/03 [^эйиүеюрх]е
SFX N3 е ийн [^эйиүеюрх]е
SFX N3 е ийнд/03 [^эйиүеюрх]е
SFX N3 е ийнх/070873 [^эйиүеюрх]е
SFX N3 ь иэ ь
SFX N3 ь иэр/03 ь
SFX N3 ь иэс/03 ь
SFX N3 ь ид [дтжзсшцчх]ь
SFX N3 ь идээ [дтжзсшцчх]ь
SFX N3 ь ийг/03 ь
SFX N3 ь ийн ь
SFX N3 ь ийнд/03 ь
SFX N3 ь ийнх/070873 ь
SFX N3 ь итэй/73 [дтжзсшцчх]ь
SFX N3 0 тэй/73 [^дтжзсшцчх]ь
SFX N3 0 тэй/73 [^ь]
SFX N3 0 гүй/73 .

SFX N4 Y 17
SFX N4 0 аа [вр]
SFX N4 0 аар/00 [вр]
SFX N4 0 аас/00 [вр]
SFX N4 0 г/00 [наоэөуүие]
SFX N4 0 гаар/00 [наоэөуүие]
SFX N4 0 гаас/00 [наоэөуүие]
SFX N4 0 гийн [наоэөуүие]
SFX N4 0 гийнд/00 [наоэөуүие]
SFX N4 0 гийнх/040870 [наоэөуүие]
SFX N4 0 д [наоэөуүиевр]
SFX N4 0 даа [наоэөуүиевр]
SFX N4 0 ыг/00 [вр]
SFX N4 0 ын [вр]
SFX N4 0 ынд/00 [вр]
SFX N4 0 ынх/040870 [вр]
SFX N4 0 тай/70 .
SFX N4 0 гүй/73 .

SFX N5 Y 30
SFX N5 0 гийн [ноаэөуүию]
SFX N5 0 гийнд/01 [ноаэөуүию]
SFX N5 0 гийнх/050871 [ноаэөуүию]
SFX N5 0 г/01 [ноаэөуүиею]
SFX N5 0 гоор/01 [ноаэөуүию]
SFX N5 0 гоос/01 [ноаэөуүию]
SFX N5 0 д [ноаэөуүеиврю]
SFX N5 0 доо [ноаэөуүеиврю]
SFX N5 0 гийн [^ь]е
SFX N5 0 гийнд/01 [^ь]е
SFX N5 0 гийнх/050871 [^ь]е
SFX N5 0 гоор/01 [^ь]е
SFX N5 0 гоос/01 [^ь]е
SFX N5 ье ийн [жчш]ье
SFX N5 ье ийнд/01 [жчш]ье
SFX N5 ье ийнх/050871 [жчш]ье
SFX N5 ье ын [^жчш]ье
SFX N5 ье ынд/01 [^жчш]ье
SFX N5 ье ынх/050871 [^жчш]ье
SFX N5 ье оор/01 ье
SFX N5 ье оос/01 ье
SFX N5 0 оо [вр]
SFX N5 0 оор/01 [вр]
SFX N5 0 оос/01 [вр]
SFX N5 0 ыг/01 [вр]
SFX N5 0 ын [вр]
SFX N5 0 ынд/01 [вр]
SFX N5 0 ынх/050871 [вр]
SFX N5 0 той/71 .
SFX N5 0 гүй/73 .

SFX N6 Y 17
SFX N6 0 гийн [наоэөуүие]
SFX N6 0 гийнд/02 [наоэөуүие]
SFX N6 0 гийнх/060872 [наоэөуүие]
SFX N6 0 г/02 [наоэөуүие]
SFX N6 0 гөөр/02 [наоэөуүие]
SFX N6 0 гөөс/02 [наоэөуүие]
SFX N6 0 д [наоэөуүиевр]
SFX N6 0 дөө [наоэөуүиевр]
SFX N6 0 ийг/02 [вр]
SFX N6 0 ийн [вр]
SFX N6 0 ийнд/02 [вр]
SFX N6 0 ийнх/060872 [вр]
SFX N6 0 өө [вр]
SFX N6 0 өөр/02 [вр]
SFX N6 0 өөс/02 [вр]
SFX N6 0 тэй/72 .
SFX N6 0 гүй/73 .

SFX N7 Y 17
SFX N7 0 гийн [наоэөуүиею]
SFX N7 0 гийнд/03 [наоэөуүиею]
SFX N7 0 гийнх/070873 [наоэөуүиею]
SFX N7 0 г/03 [наоэөуүиею]
SFX N7 0 гээр/03 [наоэөуүиею]
SFX N7 0 гээс/03 [наоэөуүиею]
SFX N7 0 д [наоэөуүиеврю]
SFX N7 0 дээ [наоэөуүиеврю]
SFX N7 0 ийг/03 [вр]
SFX N7 0 ийн [вр]
SFX N7 0 ийнд/03 [вр]
SFX N7 0 ийнх/070873 [вр]
SFX N7 0 ээ [вр]
SFX N7 0 ээр/03 [вр]
SFX N7 0 ээс/03 [вр]
SFX N7 0 тэй/73 .
SFX N7 0 гүй/73 .

SFX N8 Y 11
SFX N8 0 а [х]а
SFX N8 0 ар/00 [х]а
SFX N8 0 ас/00 [х]а
SFX N8 0 д .
SFX N8 0 даа .
SFX N8 а ыг/00 [х]а
SFX N8 а ын [х]а
SFX N8 а ынд/00 [х]а
SFX N8 а ынх/040870 [х]а
SFX N8 0 тай/70 .
SFX N8 0 гүй/73 .

SFX 0N Y 16
SFX 0N 0 гийнхан/040870 [иауях][ауя]
SFX 0N 0 гийнхных/040870 [иауях][ауя]
SFX 0N 0 нхан/040870 [йы]
SFX 0N 0 нхных/040870 [йы]
SFX 0N 0 йнхан/040870 и
SFX 0N 0 йнхных/040870 и
SFX 0N 0 ынхан/040870 [^ауийыньгжчшк]
SFX 0N 0 ынхных/040870 [^ауийыньгжчшк]
SFX 0N 0 ыхных/040870 н
SFX 0N 0 ыхан/040870 н
SFX 0N а ынхан/040870 [^ахя]а
SFX 0N а ынхных/040870 [^ахя]а
SFX 0N ь ийнхан/040870 ь
SFX 0N ь ийнхных/040870 ь
SFX 0N 0 ийнхан/040870 [гжчшк]
SFX 0N 0 ийнхных/040870 [гжчшк]

SFX 1N Y 16
SFX 1N 0 гийнхон/050871 [иоуях][оуяё]
SFX 1N 0 гийнхных/050871 [иоуях][оуяё]
SFX 1N 0 нхон/050871 [йы]
SFX 1N 0 нхных/050871 [йы]
SFX 1N 0 йнхон/050871 и
SFX 1N 0 йнхных/050871 и
SFX 1N 0 ынхон/050871 [^оуийыньгжчшк]
SFX 1N 0 ынхных/050871 [^оуийыньгжчшк]
SFX 1N 0 ыхон/050871 н
SFX 1N 0 ыхных/050871 н
SFX 1N о ынхон/050871 [^охё]о
SFX 1N о ынхных/050871 [^охё]о
SFX 1N ь ийнхон/050871 ь
SFX 1N ь ийнхных/050871 ь
SFX 1N 0 ийнхон/050871 [гжчшк]
SFX 1N 0 ийнхных/050871 [гжчшк]
